District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-113.05

Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund.

Repealed.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-242, § 6, 38 DCR 344
Sept. 29, 1992, D.C. Law 9-159, § 2(d), 39 DCR 5690
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9083, 58 DCR 6226

History

1981 Ed., § 6-995.5.

Prior Codifications